District of Columbia statutes.
34-1122

Material and equipment for tests; entry on premises of utilities for purpose of tests.

The Commission may purchase such materials, apparatus, and standard measuring instruments for such examination and tests as it may deem necessary. The Commission, its agents, experts, or examiners, shall have power to enter upon any premises occupied by any public utility for the purpose of making the examinations and tests provided for in this subtitle, and to set up and use on such premises any apparatus and appliances and occupy reasonable space therefor.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 981, ch. 150, § 8, par. 23

Cross References

Destruction of Commission property, punishment, see § 34-707.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-522.
1973 Ed., § 43-322.